apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
<!-- 
	Verbal morphology paradigms largely taken with thanks 
        from Ventsislav Zhechev's BA Thesis:
	
	 "A Finite-State Approach to the Inflectional Morphology 
	 of the Bulgarian Verb"

        Many thanks to Rosen Vladimirov for responding to questions.
-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>аАбБвВгГдДеЕжЖзЗиИйЙкКлЛмМнНоОпПрРсСтТуУфФхХцЦчЧшШщЩъЪьюЮяЯ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"        c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"       c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="num"      c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="prn"      c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"       c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="adj"      c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"      c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"     c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="ij"       c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"    c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"     c="Auxilliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="pref"     c="Prefix"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"   c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"   c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="ma"       c="Masculine (animate)"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="mfn"/>

    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="ct"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>

    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>

    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>

    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>

    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>

    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>

    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="qst"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="neg"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>

    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>

    <sdef n="aor"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="part"/>
    <sdef n="pass"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="subst"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>

    <sdef n="sent"/>

  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Punctuation -->
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  
    <!-- Numerals -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)?([%°])?</re>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l><b/>г.</l>
          <r><b/>г.<s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l>г</l>
          <r>г<s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l>км</l>
          <r>км<s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l>см</l>
          <r>см<s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l>мм</l>
          <r>мм<s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l><b/>мм</l>
          <r>мм<s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l>гр</l>
          <r>гр<s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l><b/>млн</l>
          <r>млн<s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l>млн</l>
          <r>млн<s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
<!--
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l><b/>г.<b/>пр.н.е.</l>
          <r><b/>г.<b/>пр.н.е.<s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ед/ин__num"> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ин</l>
          <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>на</l>
          <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>но</l>
          <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ни</l>
          <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>иният</l>
          <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ната</l>
          <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ното</l>
          <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ните</l>
          <r>ин<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="дв/а__num"> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ама</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ата</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>амата</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="три__num"> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ма</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>те</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мата</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="пет__num"> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>има</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>те</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имата</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="сто__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>те</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->
    <pardef n="във__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->
    <pardef n="и__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="във"><i>във</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="в"><i>в</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="вместо"><i>вместо</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="до"><i>до</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="за"><i>за</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="на"><i>на</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="от"><i>от</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="със"><i>със</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="с"><i>с</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="подир"><i>подир</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="по"><i>по</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="всред"><i>всред</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="сред"><i>сред</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="насред"><i>насред</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="въпреки"><i>въпреки</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="върху"><i>върху</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="зад"><i>зад</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="под"><i>под</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="поради"><i>поради</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="посредством"><i>посредством</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="пред"><i>пред</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="преди"><i>преди</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="след"><i>след</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="според"><i>според</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="сирямо"><i>сирямо</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="спещу"><i>спещу</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="у"><i>у</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="чрез"><i>чрез</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="из"><i>из</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="връз"><i>връз</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="въз"><i>въз</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="додето"><i>додето</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="докъм"><i>докъм</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="допреди"><i>допреди</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="заради"><i>заради</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="иззад"><i>иззад</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="изпод"><i>изпод</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="край"><i>край</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="над"><i>над</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="наместо"><i>наместо</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="о"><i>о</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="освен"><i>освен</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="откъм"><i>откъм</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="помежду"><i>помежду</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="през"><i>през</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="против"><i>против</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="свръх"><i>свръх</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="спрямо"><i>спрямо</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="между"><i>между</i><par n="във__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="и"><i>и</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="а"><i>а</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="или"><i>или</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="но"><i>но</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="нито"><i>нито</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="един"><i>ед</i><par n="ед/ин__num"/></e>
    <e lm="два"><i>дв</i><par n="дв/а__num"/></e>
    <e lm="три"><i>три</i><par n="три__num"/></e>
    <e lm="четири"><i>четири</i><par n="три__num"/></e>
    <e lm="пет"><i>пет</i><par n="пет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шест"><i>шест</i><par n="пет__num"/></e>
    <e lm="седем"><i>седем</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="осем"><i>осем</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="девет"><i>девет</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="десет"><i>десет</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="единадесет"><i>единадесет</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="дванадесет"><i>дванадесет</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="тринадесет"><i>тринадесет</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="четиринадесет"><i>четиринадесет</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="петнадесет"><i>петнадесет</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="шестнадесет"><i>шестнадесет</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="седемнадесет"><i>седемнадесет</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="осемнадесет"><i>осемнадесет</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="деветнадесет"><i>деветнадесет</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e lm="сто"><i>сто</i><par n="сто__num"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
